Washington statutes.
RCW 32.12.020

Repayment of deposits and dividends.

The sums deposited with any savings bank, together with any dividends or interest credited thereto, shall be repaid to the depositors thereof respectively, or to their legal representatives, after demand in such manner, and at such times, and under such regulations, as the board of trustees shall prescribe, subject to the provisions of this section and *chapter 30.22 RCW. These regulations shall be available to depositors upon request, and shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the principal office and each branch in this state or, if the regulations are not so posted, a description of changes in the regulations after an account is opened shall be mailed to depositors pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 4305(c) or otherwise. All such rules and regulations, and all amendments thereto, from time to time in effect, shall be binding upon all depositors.

(1) Such bank may at any time by a resolution of its board of trustees require a notice of not more than six months before repaying deposits, in which event no deposit shall be due or payable until the required notice of intention to withdraw the same shall have been personally given by the depositor: PROVIDED, That such bank at its option may pay any deposit or deposits before the expiration of such notice. But no bank shall agree with its depositors or any of them in advance to waive the requirement of notice as herein provided: PROVIDED, That the bank may create a special class of depositors who shall be entitled to receive their deposits upon demand.

(2) The savings bank may pay dividend or interest, or repay a deposit or portion thereof, upon receipt of information in written, oral, visual, electronic, or other form satisfactory to such bank, that the recipient is entitled to receipt, and may pay any check drawn upon it by a depositor.

[ 1999 c 14 s 20; 1996 c 2 s 27; 1994 c 92 s 324; 1985 c 56 s 6; 1983 c 3 s 53; 1981 c 192 s 28; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 40; 1969 c 55 s 2; 1967 c 145 s 2; 1963 c 176 s 3; 1961 c 80 s 2; 1959 c 41 s 3; 1955 c 13 s 32.12.020. Prior: 1945 c 228 s 6; 1921 c 156 s 3; 1915 c 175 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3347.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.22 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.22 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Effective date—1981 c 192: See RCW 30A.22.900.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.